Florida, session 2026, SB474.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âSection 115.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to 56 read: 57 115.01âLeave of absence for military service.âAny county or 58 state official of the state, subject to the provisions and 59 conditions hereinafter set forth, may be granted leave of 60 absence from his or her office, to serve in the volunteer forces 61 of the United States, or in the National Guard of any state, or 62 in the regular Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, 63 or Space Force of the United States, when the same shall be 64 called into active service of the United States during war 65 between the United States and a foreign government. 66 Section 2.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 115.07, 67 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) and (5), 68 respectively, subsections (1) and (2) are amended, and a new 69 subsection (3) is added to that section, to read: 70 115.07âOfficers and employeesâ leaves of absence for 71 reserve or guard training.â 72 (1)âAll officers or employees of the state, of the several 73 counties of the state, and of the municipalities or political 74 subdivisions of the state who are commissioned reserve officers 75 or reserve enlisted personnel in the United States military or 76 naval service or members of the National Guard are entitled to 77 leaves of absence from their respective duties, without loss of 78 vacation leave, pay, time, or efficiency rating, on all days 79 during which they are engaged in training ordered under the 80 provisions of the United States military or naval training 81 regulations or applicable general law for such personnel when 82 assigned to active or inactive duty. 83 (2)âLeaves of absence granted as a matter of legal right 84 under the provisions of this section may not exceed 240 working 85 hours in any one annual period, except as provided in subsection 86 (3). Administrative leaves of absence for additional or longer 87 periods of time for assignment to duty functions of a military 88 character shall be without pay, except as provided in subsection 89 (3), and shall be granted by the employing or appointing 90 authority of any state, county, municipal, or political 91 subdivision employee and when so granted shall be without loss 92 of time or efficiency rating. 93 (3)âA county, municipality, or other political subdivision 94 of the state may adopt an ordinance or resolution providing that 95 an employee who is a commissioned reserve officer or reserve 96 enlisted personnel in the United States military or naval 97 service or who is a member of the National Guard may receive 98 more than 240 working hours of paid leave from his or her 99 respective duties, without loss of vacation leave, pay, time, or 100 efficiency rating, on all days during which he or she is engaged 101 in training ordered under the provisions of the United States 102 military or naval training regulations or applicable general law 103 for such personnel when assigned to active or inactive duty, 104 provided that no state funds are used for such supplemental 105 payments. 106 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 115.08, Florida 107 Statutes, is amended to read: 108 115.08âDefinitions.â 109 (1)âThe term âactive military serviceâ as used in this 110 chapter means shall signify active duty in the Florida defense 111 force or federal service in training or on active duty with any 112 branch of the Armed Forces or Reservists of the Armed Forces, 113 the Florida National Guard, the Coast Guard of the United 114 States, and service of all officers of the United States Public 115 Health Service detailed by proper authority for duty with the 116 Armed Forces, and includes shall include the period during which 117 a person in military service is absent from duty on account of 118 sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause. 119 Section 4.âSection 115.09, Florida Statutes, is amended to 120 read: 121 115.09âLeave to public officials for military service.âAll 122 officials of the state, the several counties of the state, and 123 the municipalities or political subdivisions of the state, 124 including district school and Florida community College System 125 officers, which officials are also servicemembers in the 126 National Guard or a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the 127 United States, must be granted leave of absence from their 128 respective offices and duties to perform active military 129 service, with the first 30 days of any such leave of absence to 130 be with full pay for active federal military service that is 131 equal to or greater than 90 consecutive days on a single order. 132 Section 5.âSection 115.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to 133 read: 134 115.14âEmployees.âAll employees of the state, the several 135 counties of the state, and the municipalities or political 136 subdivisions of the state must be granted leave of absence under 137 the terms of this law; upon such leave of absence being granted, 138 such employee must enjoy the same rights and privileges as are 139 granted to officials under this law, including, without 140 limitation, receiving full pay for the first 30 days for federal 141 military service that is equal to or greater than 90 consecutive 142 days on a single order. Notwithstanding s. 115.09, the employing 143 authority may supplement the military pay of its officials and 144 employees who are reservists called to active military service 145 after the first 30 days in an amount necessary to bring their 146 total salary, inclusive of their base military pay, to the level 147 earned at the time they were called to active military duty. The 148 employing authority shall continue to provide all health 149 insurance and other existing benefits to such officials and 150 employees as required by the Uniformed Services Employment and 151 Reemployment Rights Act, chapter 43 of Title 38 U.S.C. 152 Section 6.âParagraph (g) of subsection (1) of section 153 121.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 154 121.055âSenior Management Service Class.âThere is hereby 155 established a separate class of membership within the Florida 156 Retirement System to be known as the âSenior Management Service 157 Class,â which shall become effective February 1, 1987. 158 (1) 159 (g)âEffective July 1, 1996, participation in the Senior 160 Management Service Class shall be compulsory for any member of 161 the Florida Retirement System employed with the Department of 162 Military Affairs in the uniformed positions of the Adjutant 163 General, Assistant Adjutant General-Army, Assistant Adjutant 164 General-Air, and State Quartermaster, Director of Human 165 Resources, Director of Legislative Affairs, Inspector General, 166 Executive Officer, and two positions serving as a Special 167 Projects Officer of the Florida National Guard additional 168 directors as designated by the agency head, not to exceed a 169 total of 10 positions. In lieu of participation in the Senior 170 Management Service Class, such members may participate in the 171 Senior Management Service Optional Annuity Program as 172 established in subsection (6). 173 Section 7.âParagraph (m) of subsection (2) of section 174 250.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 175 250.10âAppointment and duties of the Adjutant General.â 176 (2)âThe Adjutant General shall: 177 (m)âSubject to annual appropriations, administer youth 178 About Face programs and adult Forward March programs at sites to 179 be selected by the Adjutant General. Both programs must provide 180 schoolwork assistance, focusing on the skills needed to master 181 basic high school competencies and functional life skills, 182 including teaching students to work effectively in groups; 183 providing basic instruction in computer skills; teaching basic 184 problem-solving, decisionmaking, and reasoning skills; teaching 185 how the business world and free enterprise work through computer 186 simulations; and teaching home finance and budgeting and other 187 daily living skills. 188 1.âAbout Face is a summer and year-round after-school life 189 preparation program for economically disadvantaged and at-risk 190 youths from 13 through 17 years of age. The program must provide 191 training in academic study skills, and the basic skills that 192 businesses require for employment consideration. 193 2.âForward March is a job-readiness program for 194 economically disadvantaged participants who are directed to 195 Forward March by the local workforce development boards. The 196 Forward March program shall provide training on topics that 197 directly relate to the skills required for real-world success. 198 The program shall emphasize functional life skills, computer 199 literacy, interpersonal relationships, critical-thinking skills, 200 business skills, preemployment and work maturity skills, job 201 search skills, exploring careers activities, how to be a 202 successful and effective employee, and some job-specific skills. 203 The program also shall provide extensive opportunities for 204 participants to practice generic job skills in a supervised work 205 setting. Upon completion of the program, Forward March shall 206 return participants to the local workforce development boards 207 for placement in a job placement pool. 208 Section 8.âSubsections (4), (5), and (6) of section 209 250.116, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (7) is 210 added to that section, to read: 211 250.116âSoldiers and Airmen Assistance Program.â 212 (4)âELIGIBILITY.âPersons eligible for assistance from the 213 program include: 214 (a)âPersons eligible for assistance from the program 215 include servicemembers who are members of the Florida National 216 Guard who are: 217 1.âtraditional drilling guardsmen on state active duty or 218 on Title 32 United States Code duty, who otherwise do not 219 qualify for the assistance programs available to servicemembers 220 serving under Title 10 United States Code, and who demonstrate 221 valid financial need, and their eligible beneficiaries, and such 222 persons are authorized to apply for and receive financial 223 assistance from the program, as administered by the Florida 224 National Guard Foundationâs board of directors and its governing 225 bylaws, contingent upon the availability of funds serving in the 226 Global War on Terrorism or Overseas Contingency Operation or who 227 request assistance within 120 days after the termination of 228 orders for such service and return to their home of record. 229 2.âDeployed by the Federal Government and participating in 230 state operations for homeland defense or request assistance 231 within 120 days after the termination of orders for such service 232 and return to their home of record. 233 (b)1.âAs used in this subsection, the term âbeneficiaryâ 234 means the current spouse, dependent children, or other 235 beneficiaries as designated in the servicememberâs service 236 component records Beneficiaries of an eligible servicemember 237 designated on United States Department of Defense Form 93. 238 2.âIndividuals demonstrating a financial need for 239 authorized assistance who are dependents or family members of an 240 eligible servicemember. 241 (5)âREQUESTS FOR ASSISTANCE; REVIEW; AWARDS.â 242 (a)âA request for assistance must shall be reviewed, and 243 processed, and approved by the Florida National Guard 244 Foundationâs board of directors at the local level by an 245 official designated by the Adjutant General. During the initial 246 review and processing of the request, the Department of Military 247 Affairs may accept assistance from the direct-support 248 organization. Final review and approval of requests for 249 assistance shall be made by the Department of Military Affairs. 250 (b)âRequests for assistance must shall be reviewed and 251 evaluated based on the following criteria: 252 1.âThe impact of a servicememberâs financial situation 253 absence and inability to provide quality of life and other 254 qualifying life-impacting assist in home and vehicle repairs or 255 meet other family needs; 256 2.âThe economic impact of deployment; 257 3.âThe overall financial situation of the applicant; 258 2.4.âThe assistance authorized under the program; and 259 3.5.âAny other consideration dictated in the bylaws of the 260 Florida National Guard Foundation Other relevant information. 261 (6)âQUARTERLY FINANCIAL REVIEW.âThe financial committee of 262 the board of directors of the direct-support organization shall 263 review financial transactions of the program each quarter. The 264 board of directors must also ensure an annual external audit is 265 completed and published on the publicly available website of the 266 direct-support organization. This audit must review shall be 267 provided to the Department of Military Affairs in order to 268 determine whether the direct-support organization is being 269 operated in a manner that is consistent with the purposes of the 270 Soldiers and Airmen Assistance Fund, and in the best interests 271 of the department. The financial committee may request the 272 Office of Inspector General to conduct additional reviews. 273 (7)âANNUAL BYLAW REVIEW.âThe Florida National Guard 274 Foundationâs board of directors shall annually review the bylaws 275 that govern the program. This review shall be provided in a 276 report to the Department of Military Affairs and subject to 277 approval by the Adjutant General. 278 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 279 made by this act to section 115.01, Florida Statutes, in a 280 reference thereto, section 115.06, Florida Statutes, is 281 reenacted to read: 282 115.06âReassumption of duties.âUpon being mustered out of 283 the service of the United States, such officer granted leave 284 under s. 115.01 shall immediately enter into the duties of his 285 or her office for the remainder of the term for which he or she 286 was elected. 287 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.